src/scripts/Georgian/english_phone_mapping.foma
# Copyright (C) 2018  Olga Yakovleva <yakovleva.o.v@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define MappingExceptions 
[ax|ax0|ax1] -> a || .#. _ n ; 

define DefaultMapping 
aa -> a ,, 
aa0 -> a ,, 
aa1 -> a ,, 
ae -> a ,, 
ae0 -> a ,, 
ae1 -> a ,, 
ah -> a ,, 
ah0 -> a ,, 
ah1 -> a ,, 
ao -> o ,, 
ao0 -> o ,, 
ao1 -> o ,, 
aw -> a u ,, 
aw1 -> a u ,, 
aw0 -> a u ,, 
ax -> e ,, 
ax0 -> e ,, 
ax1 -> e ,, 
ay -> a i ,, 
ay0 -> a i ,, 
ay1 -> a i ,, 
eh -> e ,, 
eh0 -> e ,, 
eh1 -> e ,, 
er -> o r ,, 
er0 -> e r ,, 
er1 -> o r ,, 
ey -> e i ,, 
ey0 -> e i ,, 
ey1 -> e i ,, 
ih -> i ,, 
ih0 -> i ,, 
ih1 -> i ,, 
iy -> i ,, 
iy0 -> i ,, 
iy1 -> i ,, 
ow -> o u ,, 
ow0 -> o u ,, 
ow1 -> o u ,, 
oy -> o i ,, 
oy0 -> o i ,, 
oy1 -> o i ,, 
uh -> u ,, 
uh0 -> u ,, 
uh1 -> u ,, 
uw -> u ,, 
uw0 -> u ,, 
uw1 -> u ,, 
b -> b ,, 
ch -> chh ,, 
d -> d ,, 
dh -> z ,, 
f -> ph ,, 
g -> g ,, 
hh -> h ,, 
jh -> j ,, 
k -> k ,, 
l -> l ,, 
m -> m ,, 
n -> n ,, 
ng -> [n g] ,, 
p -> p ,, 
r -> r ,, 
s -> s ,, 
sh -> sh ,, 
t -> t ,, 
th -> s ,, 
v -> v ,, 
w -> v ,, 
y -> i ,, 
z -> z ,, 
zh -> zh ; 

regex 
MappingExceptions .o. 
DefaultMapping ; 
